Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-155
Employable recipients; ineligible; when; notice; appeal.

Any employable recipient who fails or refuses to participate in a county-approved vocational, rehabilitation, job training, or community service program shall be ineligible for continued general assistance for a period of three calendar months, except that any employable recipient denied general assistance pursuant to this section shall receive written notice of his or her ineligibility and shall have thirty days from the date of receipt of the written notice to appeal such decision. All such appeals shall be governed by sections 68-139 to 68-142.

Laws 1990, LB 422, § 5;

Laws 1991, LB 227, § 8.